Utah statutes.
62A-5-206.5.   Utah State Developmental Center Miscellaneous Donation Fund -- Use.

(1)  There is created an expendable special revenue fund known as the "Utah State Developmental Center Miscellaneous Donation Fund."

(2)  The division shall deposit donations made to the Utah State Developmental Center under Section 62A-1-111 into the expendable special revenue fund described in Subsection (1).

(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), no expenditure or appropriation may be made from the Utah State Developmental Center Miscellaneous Donation Fund.

(4)  The state treasurer shall invest the money in the fund described in Subsection (1) according to the procedures and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act, and the interest shall remain with the fund described in Subsection (1).

(5)  Subject to the requirements of Subsection (6), money and interest in the fund described in Subsection (1) may only be spent:

(a)  as designated by the donor; or

(b)  for the benefit of the Utah State Developmental Center and its clients.

(6)  Money may not be expended from the fund described in Subsection (1) unless the expenditure is approved by the director in consultation with the executive director of the Department of Human Services.



Enacted by Chapter 21, 2013 General Session

